West Virginia, session 2025, SB368.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for Miscellaneous boards and Agencies  to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §19-29-1 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 2, 2024, relating to the Department of Agriculture (West Virginia fish processing, 61 CSR 23A), is authorized.